Washington statutes.
RCW 43.330.550

Employer-supported child care—Technical assistance.

(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the department, in collaboration with the department of children, youth, and families, shall provide or contract to provide remote or in-person technical assistance to employers interested in supporting their employees' access to high quality child care.

(2) Technical assistance may include guidance related to:

(a) Operating a licensed child care center at or near the workplace for the benefit of employees;

(b) Financing and construction of a licensed child care center at or near the workplace for the benefit of employees;

(c) Providing financial assistance to employees for licensed or certified child care providers and license-exempt child care program expenses;

(d) Encouraging access and support for low-wage employees;

(e) Sponsoring dependent care flexible spending accounts for employees; and

(f) Developing a "bring your infant to work" program and other family-friendly work policies for employees.

[ 2021 c 199 s 308.]

NOTES:

Short title—Findings—Intent—Conflict with federal requirements—2021 c 199: See notes following RCW 43.216.770.